Washington statutes.
RCW 34.12.038

Local government whistleblower proceedings.

When requested by a local government, the chief administrative law judge shall assign an administrative law judge to conduct proceedings under chapter 42.41 RCW.

[ 1992 c 44 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1992 c 44: See RCW 42.41.901.